Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The System of  Care Advisory Council shall convene a subcommittee on
the youth behavioral health workforce.
(2) The subcommittee consists of:
(a) Members of the council, or designees of members of the council, who:
(A) Are potential employers  of graduates of youth-serving training programs for youth-
serving behavioral health professions for which there is no state-issued professional  author-
ization, including employers  in coordinated care organizations, substance use disorder
treatment centers, behavioral health care organizations, community-based organizations and
schools;
(B) Represent training programs for youth-serving behavioral health professions, includ-
ing high school career and technical  education programs, associate degree training pro-
grams, bachelor’s degree training programs and skills training programs; and
(C) Represent culturally specific organizations that serve underserved communities;
(b) Representatives of health professional regulatory agencies  that regulate behavioral
and mental health care professions, including but not limited to the Oregon Board of  Li-
censed Professional Counselors and Therapists, the Oregon  Board of Psychology and the
State Board of Licensed Social Workers; and
(c) The Early Learning System Director, or designee of the director.
(3) If no members  of the council meet a description provided in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, the council shall appoint a community member who meets the description.
(4) The subcommittee shall identify  state-issued professional authorization options for
existing and emerging behavioral health  professions and for determining the structures and
supports needed to sustain the youth behavioral health workforce. The subcommittee  shall
focus on  behavioral health professions that have the potential to increase both equitable
access to behavioral health supports and the diversity of the existing  behavioral health
workforce to be  more reflective of the youth population of this state. Additionally, the sub-
committee shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-B) Page 1
(a) Identify  existing and emerging behavioral health professions that serve the youth
population of this state and  for which there are no state-issued professional authorizations,
including information about the defining characteristics of  each profession and the ability
of each profession to increase access to and diversity of the behavioral health workforce;
(b) Provide recommendations regarding how to better align the  behavioral health pro-
fessions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection with existing health professional regu-
latory agencies;
(c) Develop recommendations to establish state-issued professional authorizations to
support expanding the behavioral health workforce that serves the youth population of this
state;  and
(d) Identify strategies for creating pathways into the behavioral  health professions that
serve the  youth population of this state for individuals who are underrepresented in the
current behavioral health workforce.
(5) The subcommittee shall submit, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245:
(a) An initial report,  which may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to behavioral health  not later than Septem-
ber 15, 2024; and
(b) A final report, which may include recommendations for legislation, to  the Legislative
Assembly not later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2025.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Health Systems Division - Administration, is in-
creased by $196,253 for the System of Care Advisory Council subcommittee on the  youth be-
havioral workforce.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-B) Page 2